Utah statutes.
19-6-323.   Department authority to enter cooperative agreements.

The department, on behalf of the state, is authorized to undertake activities and enter into contracts and cooperative agreements with the federal Environmental Protection Agency as provided by the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, PL 96-510.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session

